Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 26 The Rhode Island Livestock Welfare and Care Standards Advisory Council Act of 2012

4-26-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Livestock Welfare and Care Standards Advisory Council Act of 2012.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1.

4-26-2.
Findings.

The general assembly hereby finds that:

Livestock is the core of dairy and livestock farming in Rhode Island.

The care and management of livestock are important to the profitability of Rhode Island farms and the maintenance of Rhode Island’s working landscape.

There exists in this state a demand for safe, locally produced food.

Livestock raised on Rhode Island farms offers profit potential and economic opportunity for Rhode Island producers.

Livestock deserve a safe, healthy and humane environment that ensures protection from unnecessary or unjustifiable pain.

The state would benefit from a diverse body charged with making policy recommendations to the department regarding livestock care.

It is the intent of this legislation to assure the continued success of livestock and dairy farming in Rhode Island and the continuance of a safe, local food supply.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1.

4-26-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates a different meaning or intent:

“Advisory council” or “council” means the Rhode Island livestock welfare and care standards advisory council act of 2012 established pursuant to §

4-26-4

.

“Agricultural operation” means any individual, partnership or corporation that complies with §

44-27-3

and subsection

2-1-22(j)

and produces and distributes a commercial food, feed, fiber or horticultural product.

“Biosecurity” means security from transmission of infectious diseases, parasites and pests.

“Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of environmental management.

“License” means the certificate issued by the director to any person, firm, partnership, or corporation regularly engaged in the business of buying, selling and/or transporting livestock to be sold or used for food.

“Livestock” means any bovine, equine, caprine, ovine, camelid, swine, poultry, or other animal that is raised for production of food or fiber, or is used for work, commerce, or exhibition.

“State veterinarian’ means a licensed veterinarian employed by the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1.

4-26-4.
Advisory council established.

There is established a livestock care standards advisory council consisting of the state veterinarian, or his or her designee, who shall serve as the chairperson and six (6) public members appointed by the director as follows:

A representative from the Rhode Island farm bureau, or his or her designee, who shall serve as secretary;

A representative from the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or his or her designee;

A Rhode island based livestock farmer, or his or her designee;

A representative from the University of Rhode Island department of environment and life sciences, or his or her designee;

A representative from a Rhode Island nonprofit animal welfare entity, or his or her designee; and

A representative from a national nonprofit animal welfare entity.

Two (2) of those new members first appointed by the director shall serve initial terms of three (3) years; two (2) of those new members first appointed by the director shall serve an initial term of two (2) years; and two (2) of those new members, appointed by the director shall serve an initial term of one year. Thereafter, all appointed members of the advisory council shall be appointed to serve for terms of three (3) years. The members are eligible to succeed themselves. A vacancy other than by expiration shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment but only for the unexpired portion of the term.

The director may remove any member from the council for neglect of any duty required by law, or for incompetence, or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.

The members of the council shall receive no compensation for their services but may receive reimbursement for travel and other necessary expenses while engaged in the performance of official duties of the council.

The council shall meet at least quarterly and at the call of the chairperson or four (4) members of the council. A majority of seats filled shall constitute a quorum.

The council shall receive staff and administrative support from the department. The director shall furnish the advisory board a suitable location to hold its meeting.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish such advice and information, documentation, and otherwise to the council and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the council to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1.

4-26-5.
Duties of the council.

The council shall support and work collaboratively with the department as follows:

Review and evaluate laws and rules of the state applicable to the care and handling of livestock as defined in subdivision

4-26-3(6)

including, but not limited to:

The overall health and welfare of livestock species;

Agricultural operation best management practices;

Biosecurity and disease prevention;

Humane transport and slaughter practices; and

Any other matters the council considers necessary for the proper care and well being of livestock animals in the state.

Respond to requests from the legislature for information and comments on proposed legislation;

Issue recommendations necessary to achieve these goals;

Submit policy recommendations to the director and general assembly on any of the subject matter set forth under subdivision (ii) of this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 7.

4-26-6.
Reporting requirements.

The council shall provide a report of its recommendations and findings. Said report shall be provided to the department, governor and general assembly by April 30, 2013.

Thereafter, the council shall provide a written report to the governor and the general assembly, no later than April 30 of each year, on the progress made in achieving the goals and objectives set forth in this chapter and any other pertinent information by April 30, 2013.

The council shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 38-2, access to public records act, and chapter 42-46, open meetings act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 381, § 1.